fr: Format de publicité vintage: Affiche publicitaire (petit format); Brochure/dépliant; Présentoir en carton; Page de catalogue; Coupon; Prospectus/tract; Publicité dans un magazine; Publicité sur pochette d’allumettes; Plaque en métal; Enseigne au néon; Publicité dans un journal; Présentoir de point de vente (POS); Publicité sur carte postale; Affiche; Étiquette d’emballage de produit; Autocollant/décalcomanie; Plaque en tôle lithographiée; Carte commerciale; Affiche de vitrine; Autre
fi: Vintagemainoksen formaatti: Mainostaulun juliste (pieni koko); Esite/pamfletti; Pahvinen mainosteline; Luettelosivu; Kuponki; Lentolehtinen; Aikakauslehtimainos; Tulitikkurasiamainos; Metallikyltti; Neonvalokyltti; Sanomalehtimainos; Myymälämainos (POS); Postikorttimainos; Juliste; Tuotepakkauksen etiketti; Tarra/siirtokuva; Litografiapeltikyltti; Mainoskortti; Ikkunamainos; Muu
el: Μορφή vintage διαφήμισης: Αφίσα πινακίδας (μικρού μεγέθους); Μπροσούρα/φυλλάδιο; Σταντ από χαρτόνι; Σελίδα καταλόγου; Κουπόνι; Φεϊγβολάν/φυλλάδιο; Διαφήμιση σε σελίδα περιοδικού; Διαφήμιση σε σπιρτόκουτο; Μεταλλική πινακίδα; Επιγραφή νέον; Διαφήμιση σε εφημερίδα; Σταντ σημείου πώλησης (POS); Διαφήμιση σε καρτ ποστάλ; Αφίσα; Ετικέτα συσκευασίας προϊόντος; Αυτοκόλλητο/χαλκομανία; Λιθογραφική πινακίδα από κασσίτερο; Εμπορική κάρτα; Κάρτα βιτρίνας; Άλλο
sv: Format på vintageannons: Affischtavla (litet format); Broschyr/pamflett; Kartongdisplay; Katalogsida; Kupong; Flygblad/reklamblad; Magasinsannons; Tändsticksaskannons; Metallskylt; Neonskylt; Dagstidningsannons; Butiksdisplay (POS); Vykortsreklam; Affisch; Etikett för produktförpackning; Klistermärke/dekal; Lito-plåtskylt; Reklamkort; Fönsterskylt; Övrigt
da: Format for vintageannonce: Plakat til billboard (lille format); Brochure/pjece; Papdisplay; Katalogside; Kupon; Flyer/løbeseddel; Magasinannonce; Annonce på tændstikæske; Metalskilt; Neonskilt; Avisannonce; POS-display (Point-of-sale); Reklamepostkort; Plakat; Label til produktemballage; Klistermærke/mærkat; Litografisk blikskilt; Reklamekort; Vinduesplakat; Andet
zh-TW: 復古廣告格式: 廣告看板海報 (小尺寸); 手冊/小冊子; 紙板展示架; 目錄頁面; 優惠券; 傳單/廣告單; 雜誌內頁廣告; 火柴盒廣告; 金屬標誌; 霓虹燈招牌; 報紙廣告; 銷售時點情報系統 (POS) 展示架; 明信片廣告; 海報; 商品包裝標籤; 貼紙/壁貼; 平版印刷鐵牌; 廣告卡; 櫥窗廣告卡; 其他
ko: 빈티지 광고 포맷: 빌보드 포스터(소형); 브로셔/팸플릿; 판지 디스플레이; 카탈로그 페이지; 쿠폰; 전단/핸드빌; 잡지 페이지 광고; 성냥갑 광고; 금속 간판; 네온사인; 신문 광고; 판매 시점(POS) 디스플레이; 엽서 광고; 포스터; 제품 패키지 레이블; 스티커/데칼; 양철 인쇄 간판; 트레이드 카드; 윈도우 카드; 기타
bg-BG: Формат на винтидж реклама: Билборд плакат (малък формат); Брошура/дипляна; Картонен дисплей; Страница от каталог; Талон; Флаер/листовка; Реклама на страница от списание; Реклама на кибрит; Метална табела; Неонова табела; Реклама във вестник; Дисплей за място на продажба (POS); Рекламна пощенска картичка; Плакат; Етикет на опаковка на продукт; Стикер/ваденка; Тенекиена литографска табела; Търговска картичка; Картичка за витрина; Друго
nl: Formaat vintage-advertentie: Billboardposter (klein formaat); Brochure/pamflet; Kartonnen display; Cataloguspagina; Coupon; Flyer/strooibiljet; Tijdschriftadvertentie; Luciferdoosjesadvertentie; Metalen bord; Neonbord; Krantenadvertentie; Point-of-sale (POS) display; Ansichtkaartadvertentie; Poster; Etiket productverpakking; Sticker/decal; Blikken lithobord; Reclamekaart; Raambiljet; Overige
it: Formato dell'annuncio vintage: Manifesto pubblicitario (piccolo formato); Brochure/pamphlet; Espositore in cartone; Pagina di catalogo; Coupon; Volantino/manifesto; Annuncio su pagina di rivista; Pubblicità su scatola di fiammiferi; Targa in metallo; Insegna al neon; Annuncio su giornale; Espositore per punto vendita (POS); Cartolina pubblicitaria; Poster; Etichetta di imballaggio prodotto; Adesivo/decalcomania; Targa in latta litografata; Cartolina commerciale; Cartello da vetrina; Altro
ro-RO: Format vintage al reclamei: Afiș publicitar (format mic); Broșură / Pliant; Display din carton; Pagină de catalog; Cupon; Fluturaș / Pliant; Anunț publicitar în revistă; Reclamă pe cutii de chibrituri; Placă metalică; Reclamă luminoasă cu neon; Anunț publicitar în ziar; Display pentru punctul de vânzare (POS); Publicitate pe cărți poștale; Poster; Etichetă pentru ambalajul produsului; Autocolant / Decalcomanie; Plăcuță litografiată din tablă; Cartonaș publicitar; Afiș de vitrină; Altele
pl: Format reklamy w stylu vintage: Plakat billboardowy (mały format); Broszura/ulotka; Ekspozytor tekturowy; Strona z katalogu; Kupon; Ulotka; Reklama prasowa z czasopisma; Reklama na pudełku zapałek; Metalowy szyld; Neon; Reklama w gazecie; Ekspozytor w punkcie sprzedaży (POS); Pocztówka reklamowa; Plakat; Etykieta z opakowania produktu; Naklejka/kalkomania; Blaszany szyld litograficzny; Karta reklamowa; Plakat na witrynę; Inne
tr: Vintage reklam formatı: Billboard posteri (küçük format); Broşür/el ilanı; Karton stand; Katalog sayfası; Kupon; El ilanı/broşür; Dergi sayfası reklamı; Kibrit kutusu reklamı; Metal tabela; Neon tabela; Gazete reklamı; Satış noktası (POS) standı; Kartpostal reklamı; Poster; Ürün ambalaj etiketi; Çıkartma/dekal; Teneke litografi tabela; Ticaret kartı; Vitrin kartı; Diğer
es: Formato de anuncio publicitario clásico: Póster de valla publicitaria (formato pequeño); Folleto/panfleto; Exhibidor de cartón; Página de catálogo; Cupón; Volante/prospecto; Anuncio de página de revista; Anuncio en cajetilla de fósforos; Letrero de metal; Letrero de neón; Anuncio de periódico; Exhibidor de punto de venta (POS); Publicidad en postal; Póster; Etiqueta de embalaje del producto; Pegatina/calcomanía; Letrero litográfico de hojalata; Tarjeta comercial; Cartel de escaparate; Otro
hu: Vintage hirdetési formátum: Óriásplakát (kis formátum); Brosúra/pamflet; Karton display; Katalógusoldal; Kupon; Szórólap/röplap; Magazinhirdetés; Gyufásdoboz-hirdetés; Fémtábla; Neonfelirat; Újsághirdetés; Eladáshelyi (POS) display; Képeslap-hirdetés; Plakát; Termékcsomagolási címke; Matrica/levonó; Litografált fémtábla; Kereskedelmi kártya; Kirakatkártya; Egyéb
pt-BR: Formato de anúncio vintage: Pôster de outdoor (formato pequeno); Folheto/panfleto; Display de papelão; Página de catálogo; Cupom; Folheto/panfleto; Anúncio de página de revista; Anúncio em caixa de fósforos; Placa de metal; Placa de neon; Anúncio de jornal; Display de ponto de venda (PDV); Anúncio em cartão-postal; Pôster; Rótulo de embalagem de produto; Adesivo/decalque; Placa de lata litografada; Cartão comercial; Cartaz de vitrine; Outro
pt-PT: Formato do anúncio publicitário vintage: Poster de cartaz (formato pequeno); Brochura/panfleto; Expositor de cartão; Página de catálogo; Cupão; Folheto/panfleto; Anúncio de página de revista; Anúncio em caixa de fósforos; Placa metálica; Placa de néon; Anúncio de jornal; Expositor de ponto de venda (POS); Anúncio de postal; Poster; Etiqueta da embalagem do produto; Autocolante/decalque; Placa de lata litografada; Cartão comercial; Cartaz de montra; Outro
cs: Formát staré reklamy: Plakát na billboard (malý formát); Brožura/leták; Kartonový poutač; Katalogová strana; Kupón; Leták; Reklama z časopisu; Reklama na krabičce zápalek; Kovová cedule; Neonový nápis; Novinová reklama; Prodejní poutač (POS); Pohlednicová reklama; Plakát; Etiketa balení produktu; Nálepka/obtisk; Plechová potištěná cedule; Obchodní karta; Výlohový poutač; Jiné
nb: Format for vintage reklame: Reklameplakat (lite format); Brosjyre/flygeblad; Pappdisplay; Katalogside; Kupong; Flyer/flygeblad; Magasinsideannonse; Fyrstikkeskereklame; Metallskilt; Neonskilt; Avisannonse; POS-display; Postkortreklame; Plakat; Produktemballasjeetikett; Klistremerke/dekal; Litografisk blikkskilt; Reklamekort; Vindusplakat; Annet
ja: ヴィンテージ広告フォーマット: ビルボードポスター (小型); ブローシュア / パンフレット; 段ボール製ディスプレイ; カタログページ; クーポン; フライヤー / チラシ; 雑誌広告; マッチブック広告; 金属製看板; ネオンサイン; 新聞広告; POSディスプレイ; はがき広告; ポスター; 商品パッケージラベル; ステッカー / デカール; ブリキ看板; トレードカード; ウィンドウカード; その他
sl-SI: Format starinskega (vintage) oglasa: Plakat za pano (majhen format); Brošura/zloženka; Kartonasto stojalo; Stran iz kataloga; Kupon; Letak; Oglas v reviji; Oglas na vžigalicah; Kovinska tabla; Neonski napis; Časopisni oglas; Stojalo za prodajno mesto (POS); Oglaševalska razglednica; Plakat; Etiketa embalaže izdelka; Nalepka; Pločevinasta litografirana tabla; Oglaševalska kartica (trade card); Oglas za izložbo; Drugo
hr-HR: Format vintage oglasa: Jumbo plakat (mali format); Brošura/letak; Kartonski izložbeni stalak; Stranica kataloga; Kupon; Letak; Oglas u časopisu; Oglas na kutiji šibica; Metalni natpis; Neonski natpis; Novinski oglas; POS izložbeni stalak; Reklamna razglednica; Plakat; Naljepnica za pakiranje proizvoda; Naljepnica/preslikač; Limeni litografski natpis; Trgovačka kartica; Plakat za izlog; Ostalo
ru: Формат винтажной рекламы: Плакат для билборда (малый формат); Брошюра/буклет; Картонный дисплей; Страница каталога; Купон; Флаер/листовка; Реклама на странице журнала; Реклама на спичечных коробках; Металлическая вывеска; Неоновая вывеска; Газетная реклама; POS-материалы (дисплей); Рекламная открытка; Плакат; Этикетка упаковки товара; Наклейка/декаль; Жестяная литографированная вывеска; Торговая карточка; Витринная карточка; Другое
sk-SK: Formát vintage reklamy: Billboardový plagát (malý formát); Brožúra/pamflet; Kartónový pútač; Katalógová strana; Kupón; Leták; Celostranová reklama v časopise; Reklama na zápalkovej škatuľke; Kovová tabuľa; Neónový nápis; Novinová reklama; Pútač v mieste predaja (POS); Reklamná pohľadnica; Plagát; Štítok na obale produktu; Nálepka/obtlačok; Plechová litografická tabuľa; Obchodná karta; Výkladná karta; Iné
zh-CN: 怀旧广告形式: 广告牌海报（小幅）; 手册/小册子; 纸板展示; 产品目录页; 优惠券; 传单/散页; 杂志内页广告; 火柴盒广告; 金属标牌; 霓虹灯招牌; 报纸广告; 销售终端 (POS) 展示; 明信片广告; 海报; 产品包装标签; 贴纸/贴花; 镀锡铁皮彩印标牌; 贸易卡片; 橱窗卡; 其他
th: รูปแบบโฆษณาแบบวินเทจ: โปสเตอร์บิลบอร์ด (ขนาดเล็ก); โบรชัวร์/แผ่นพับ; ป้ายโฆษณากระดาษแข็ง; หน้าแค็ตตาล็อก; คูปอง; ใบปลิว/ใบประกาศ; โฆษณาในหน้านิตยสาร; โฆษณาบนสมุดไม้ขีดไฟ; ป้ายโลหะ; ป้ายไฟนีออน; โฆษณาในหนังสือพิมพ์; ป้ายโฆษณา ณ จุดขาย (POS); โฆษณาบนไปรษณียบัตร; โปสเตอร์; ฉลากบรรจุภัณฑ์สินค้า; สติกเกอร์/รูปลอก; ป้ายสังกะสีพิมพ์ลาย; บัตรการค้า; ป้ายติดกระจก; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Senovinės reklamos formatas: Reklaminis stendas (mažo formato); Brošiūra / lankstinukas; Kartoninis stendas; Katalogo puslapis; Kuponas; Skrajutė; Žurnalo puslapio reklama; Degtukų dėžutės reklama; Metalinė iškaba; Neoninė iškaba; Laikraščio skelbimas; Pardavimo vietos (POS) stendas; Reklaminis atvirukas; Plakatas; Produkto pakuotės etiketė; Lipdukas / dekalė; Skardinė litografijos iškaba; Prekybos kortelė; Vitrinos kortelė; Kita
de: Format der Retro-Werbung: Plakat (Kleinformat); Broschüre/Flugblatt; Kartonaufsteller; Katalogseite; Coupon; Flyer/Handzettel; Zeitschriftenanzeige; Streichholzschachtel-Werbung; Metallschild; Neonschild; Zeitungsanzeige; Point-of-Sale-Display (POS); Werbepostkarte; Poster; Produktverpackungsetikett; Aufkleber/Abziehbild; Blechschild (Lithographie); Werbekarte; Schaufensterplakat; Sonstiges
vi: Hình thức quảng cáo cổ điển: Áp phích biển quảng cáo (cỡ nhỏ); Sách mỏng/tờ gấp; Bảng trưng bày bằng bìa cứng; Trang danh mục; Phiếu giảm giá; Tờ rơi/truyền đơn; Quảng cáo trên trang tạp chí; Quảng cáo trên bao diêm; Biển báo kim loại; Biển đèn neon; Quảng cáo trên báo; Bảng trưng bày tại điểm bán hàng (POS); Quảng cáo qua bưu thiếp; Áp phích; Nhãn bao bì sản phẩm; Nhãn dán/đề can; Biển thiếc in thạch bản; Thẻ giao dịch; Thẻ cửa sổ; Khác
en: Vintage advertisement format: Billboard poster (small format); Brochure/pamphlet; Cardboard display; Catalog page; Coupon; Flyer/handbill; Magazine page ad; Matchbook advertisement; Metal sign; Neon sign; Newspaper ad; Point-of-sale (POS) display; Postcard advertising; Poster; Product packaging label; Sticker/decal; Tin litho sign; Trade card; Window card; Other